Missouri, session 2026, HB3237.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Section 94.815, RSMo, is repealed and one new section enacted in lieu
thereof, to be known as section 94.815, to read as follows:
94.815. 1. All taxes authorized and collected under sections 94.800 to 94.825 shall be
deposited by the municipality in a special trust fund to be known as the "Tourism Tax Trust
Fund". The moneys in such tourism tax trust fund shall not be commingled with any funds of
the municipality.
2. (1) Except as provided in subsection 3 of this section, seventy-five percent of the
taxes collected shall be deposited in an "Infrastructure Account" within the tourism tax trust
fund and shall be used, upon appropriation by the municipality, solely for the purpose of
constructing and maintaining tourism infrastructure facilities and infrastructure
improvements[, to include] including, but not limited to, sidewalks, streets, highways,
roads, waterworks, wastewater including distribution and collection systems and solid waste
disposal facilities, the costs of which may be funded by issuing bonds which may be retired
by revenues received from tourism taxes imposed pursuant to sections 94.802 and 94.805 or
the retirement of debt under previously voter-approved bonded indebtedness and the costs of
operation and maintenance of such infrastructure improvements. In addition to the
provisions of this subsection, the funds in the infrastructure account may be used for the
purpose of constructing and maintaining structures, trails, and other facilities for the
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 3237 2
purpose of promoting tourism including, but not limited to, an indoor sports facility, the
costs of which may be funded by issuing bonds as provided herein.
(2) As used in this subsection, "tourism infrastructure facilities" means
structures, fixtures, systems, and facilities of a multipurpose sports and entertainment
venue with a seating capacity of fewer than twenty-five thousand, including associated
parking facilities, that are owned or operated by any public body and that the
municipality determines are a contributing factor in the attraction of sports,
recreational, entertainment, or meeting activities, either professional or amateur,
commercial or private. Such structures, fixtures, systems, and facilities may include,
but are not limited to, foundations, roofs, interior and exterior walls or windows, floors,
steps, stairs, concourses, hallways, restrooms, event or meeting spaces, or other
hospitality-related areas, concession or food preparation areas, and services systems.
3. Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection 2 of this section, if any outstanding
bonds have been issued or indebtedness has been incurred prior to or after September 15,
1997, for the purpose of constructing and maintaining infrastructure improvements, including
sidewalks, streets, highways, roads, parks, waterworks, wastewater including distribution
and collection systems and solid waste disposal facilities, then a portion of the seventy-five
percent of the collected taxes to be deposited in the infrastructure account pursuant to
subsection 2 of this section shall instead be deposited in a "Debt Retirement Account" within
the tourism tax trust fund. The portion of the seventy-five percent of collected taxes to be
deposited in the debt retirement account and the administration of such account shall be
pursuant to section 94.820.
4. Twenty-five percent of the taxes collected shall be deposited into a "Tourism
Promotion Account" within the tourism tax trust fund and shall be used, upon appropriation
by the municipality, for tourism marketing and promotional purposes.
5. The tourism taxes authorized by sections 94.802 and 94.805 shall be in addition to
any and all other taxes allowed by law, but no ordinance imposing a tax under sections 94.802
and 94.805 shall be effective unless the governing body of the municipality submits to the
voters of the municipality at an election permitted pursuant to section 115.123 a proposal to
authorize the governing body of the municipality to impose such tax and, if such tax is to be
used to retire bonds authorized under this section, to authorize such bonds and their
retirement by such tax or charge or to authorize the retirement of debt under previously voter-
approved bonded indebtedness.
✔